Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 4.1 Milk Commission

21-4.1-1.
Milk commission — Composition.

There shall be a milk commission which shall consist of three (3) members: the director of health or his or her designee, the attorney general or his or her designee, and the director of environmental management or his or her designee. The members of the commission shall elect a chairperson from among themselves.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 3.

21-4.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless otherwise specified, the following words have the following meaning:

“Commission” means the Rhode Island milk commission.

“Consumer” means any person other than a milk dealer who purchases milk for fluid consumption.

“Dealer” means any person who purchases or receives milk from a producer for the purpose of resale.

“Department” means the department of health.

“Director” means the director of health or his or her duly authorized agents.

“Fluid milk products” or “Class 1 milk” means milk, skimmed milk, flavored milk or skimmed milk, cultured skimmed milk, buttermilk, filled milk, concentrated milk, and any mixture of milk or skimmed milk and cream containing less than ten percent (10%) butterfat. The term includes these products in fluid, frozen, fortified, or reconstituted form but does not include sterilized products in hermetically sealed containers and such products as eggnog, yogurt, whey, ice cream mix, ice milk mix, milk shake base mix, evaporated or condensed milk or skimmed milk (in either plain or sweetened form), and any product that contains six percent (6%) or more non-milk fat (or oil). Fluid milk products that have been placed in containers for disposition to retail or wholesale outlets are referred to as packaged fluid milk products.

“Market” means any city, town or parts of a city or town of the state, or two (2) or more cities or towns or parts of cities or towns designated by the commission as a natural marketing area.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association or other unit, and the state and all political subdivisions or agencies of the state, except state owned and operated institutions.

“Producer” means a Rhode Island dairy farmer who produces milk that is moved, other than in packaged form, from his or her farm to a pool plant or any other plant as diverted milk.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 3.

21-4.1-3.
Powers and duties.

The commission shall set the minimum price paid to the producer for Class 1 milk.

The commission shall conduct independent studies and reviews of the economics and practices of the milk industry in order to determine whether any producer or dealer is engaged in predatory pricing or other anticompetitive activity in violation of §

6-13-2.1

.

The commission may adopt, promulgate and enforce all rules, regulations and orders necessary to the commission’s performance of its duties under this chapter.

Every producer and every dealer shall keep and render to the commission, at the times and in the manner and form as shall be prescribed by the rules and regulations of the director, accounts of all business transacted which is related to the production, purchasing, processing, distribution or sale of milk in this state. Those accounts shall reasonably and accurately reflect, in any detail that the commission deems necessary and appropriate: (1) milk prices generally, (2) container costs, (3) price categories relating to different quantities of milk packaged and sold in separate containers, (4) distribution costs, and (5) any other matters which affect or which are relevant to retail milk prices in this state.

All information collected and renamed by the commission in the performance of its duties shall be confidential, except that the information may be disclosed to public officials when necessary or appropriate to the performance of their official duties. Collective information of a general statistical nature may be reported.

The commission shall conduct any public hearings that it deems necessary and appropriate to its performance of its duties under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 3.

21-4.1-4.
Annual report.

On or before January 15 of each year the commission shall submit a report to the general assembly, which annual report may include, but need not be limited to:

A summary of its activities during the previous year;

A description of any and all complaints of predatory pricing or other anti-competitive practices which have been referred to the attorney general; and

Any recommendations that it may have relative to the need for and the appropriateness of regulatory or legislative action relative to the milk industry.

In making recommendations for regulatory or legislative action, the commission shall take into account, among any other factors which it may deem appropriate:

The public health and welfare and the insuring of an adequate supply of pure and wholesome fluid milk products to the inhabitants of the state under varying conditions in various marketing areas;

Prevailing prices in neighboring states;

Seasonal production and other conditions affecting the cost of production, transportation, and marketing in the milk industry, including a reasonable return to the dealer and different retail delivery volumes of milk;

The effect of prices paid to producers on the ability of the Rhode Island dairy industry to compete in supplying milk to Rhode Island consumers;

The strength and viability of the Rhode Island dairy industry as a whole; and

The extent of any social or economic benefits of maintaining dairy processing in different regions of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 3.

21-4.1-5.
Recordkeeping.

All producers and dealers shall keep records consistent with all current state and federal law and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 3.

21-4.1-6.
Prohibition on pricing.

No dealer shall purchase or receive Class 1 milk from any Rhode Island producer for any price less than the minimum price set by the commission pursuant to §

21-4.1-3(a)

of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 4.

21-4.1-7.
Denial or revocation of permit.

Violation of the prohibition set forth in §

21-4.1-6

by any dealer shall be grounds for the denial of any permit sought by that dealer pursuant to §

21-2-8

and for revocation of any permit previously issued to that dealer, in accordance with §

21-2-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 4.

21-4.1-8.
Preference.

Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in chapter 2 of title 37 or in any city or town charter or ordinance, any Rhode Island milk processor or distributor which bids on any state, city, town, or regional school district contract for the purchase of milk within this state shall be entitled to and shall be given a percentage preference of one quarter of one percent (0.25%) over any out-of-state milk provider or distributor bidding on the same contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 4.

21-4.1-9.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph or part of this chapter or of §

21-2-8

or

21-2-12

shall for any reason be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of it, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph or part directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 320, § 4.